Hawaii statutes.
§53-20 Auxiliary redevelopment area.
Where a redevelopment agency finds:

(1) That there is a shortage of decent, safe, and
sanitary housing in the county;

(2) That the provision of decent, safe, and sanitary
dwelling accommodations on undeveloped vacant land, not within a blighted area,
is necessary to accomplish the relocation of families to be displaced from
blighted areas which are to be redeveloped or displaced from disaster areas as
defined in this chapter; and

(3) That the acquisition of a particularly described
area of the undeveloped vacant land (hereinafter called an "auxiliary
redevelopment area"), suitable for development for predominantly
residential uses and so characterized in the master plan, is essential to the
proper clearance or redevelopment of blighted or disaster areas or a necessary
part of the general program for clearance or redevelopment of blighted or
disaster areas in the county;

then, subject to the conditions hereinafter stated,
the acquisition, planning, preparation for development, or disposal of such
auxiliary redevelopment area shall constitute a redevelopment project which may
be undertaken by the agency in the manner provided by this part. The procedure
for the preparation, submission, and the final approval, amendment and
approval, or disapproval, of the redevelopment project, and subsequent
proceedings with respect thereto, shall be the same, as nearly as may be, as in
the case of other redevelopment projects, except that:

(1) The council shall not approve such plan or
project unless it shall by resolution, concur in every finding of the agency
required by this section and also find that the auxiliary redevelopment area
will be developed for predominantly residential uses; and

(2) The requirement of a finding that the
redevelopment project is in a blighted area prescribed by section 53-6 shall
not be applicable. [L 1951, c 244, pt of §3; RL 1955, §143-20; am L Sp 1960, c
5, §3; am L 1965, c 101, §1(j); HRS §53-20]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next